District of Columbia statutes.
8-233.06

Rules; enforcement.

(a)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter.

(b)

The Mayor may impose civil fines and penalties as sanctions for violations of the provisions of this subchapter or any rules issued under the authority of this subchapter, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2 [§ 2-1801.01 et seq.] (“Civil Infractions Act”). Enforcement and adjudication of an infraction shall be pursuant to the Civil Infractions Act.

(c)

In addition to the enforcement authority provided in subsection (b) of this section, the Mayor may seek injunctive relief or other appropriate remedy in any court of competent jurisdiction to enforce compliance with the provisions of this subchapter.

History

Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-205, § 7, 61 DCR 12587